Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1601
SPF, defined.

As used in sections 54-1601 to 54-1605, unless the context otherwise requires, SPF shall mean specific pathogen-free swine, which must conform to the conditions and health standards prescribed by the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources or its designated agents under such sections.

Laws 1967, c. 338, § 1, p. 905;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 37.